District of Columbia statutes.
42-502

Fee simple estates — Estates tail abolished.

All estates of inheritance, including such as were formerly estates tail, shall be adjudged estates in fee simple.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1350, ch. 854, § 1012
1981 Ed., § 45-202.
1973 Ed., § 45-802.